examples/new-example.dix
<dictionary type="separable">
  <alphabet>
    ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâäçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyziǎšěřčžǔůýệướễăạảðÐđ
  </alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="adj"/>
    <sdef n="adv"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"/>
    <sdef n="det"/>
    <sdef n="gen"/>
    <sdef n="n"/>
    <sdef n="sep"/>
    <sdef n="nom"/>
    <sdef n="np"/>
    <sdef n="num"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
    <sdef n="pos"/>
    <sdef n="pp"/>
    <sdef n="pr"/>
    <sdef n="prn"/>
    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="v"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"/>
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="adj">
      <e><i><w/><s n="adj"/><j/></i></e>
      <e><i><w/><s n="adj"/><t/><j/></i></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="adv">
      <e><i><w/><s n="adv"/><j/></i></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cnjcoo">
      <e><i><w/><s n="cnjcoo"/><j/></i></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="det">
      <e><i><w/><s n="det"/><t/><j/></i></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="det-pos">
      <e><i><w/><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><t/><j/></i></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="gen">
      <e><i><w/><s n="gen"/><j/></i></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="n">
      <e><i><w/><s n="n"/><t/><j/></i></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="np">
      <e><i><w/><s n="np"/><t/><j/></i></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="num">
      <e><i><w/><s n="num"/><j/></i></e>
      <e><i><w/><s n="num"/><t/><j/></i></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pr">
      <e><i><w/><s n="pr"/><j/></i></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="prn">
      <e><i><w/><s n="prn"/><t/><j/></i></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="modifier-n">
      <e><par n="adj"/><par n="n"/></e>
      <e><par n="adj"/><par n="adj"/><par n="n"/></e>
      <e><par n="adj"/><par n="cnjcoo"/><par n="adj"/><par n="n"/></e>
      <e><par n="num"/><par n="n"/></e>
      <e><par n="num"/><par n="adj"/><par n="n"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="det-modifier-n">
      <e><par n="det"/><par n="n"/></e>
      <e><par n="det"/><par n="modifier-n"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="freq-adv">
      <e><i>always<s n="adv"/><j/></i></e>
      <e><i>anually<s n="adv"/><j/></i></e>
      <e><i>bianually<s n="adv"/><j/></i></e>
      <e><i>constantly<s n="adv"/><j/></i></e>
      <e><i>daily<s n="adv"/><j/></i></e>
      <e><i>eventually<s n="adv"/><j/></i></e>
      <e><i>frequently<s n="adv"/><j/></i></e>
      <e><i>generally<s n="adv"/><j/></i></e>
      <e><i>hourly<s n="adv"/><j/></i></e>
      <e><i>monthly<s n="adv"/><j/></i></e>
      <e><i>never<s n="adv"/><j/></i></e>
      <e><i>nightly<s n="adv"/><j/></i></e>
      <e><i>normally<s n="adv"/><j/></i></e>
      <e><i>occasionally<s n="adv"/><j/></i></e>
      <e><i>often<s n="adv"/><j/></i></e>
      <e><i>quarterly<s n="adv"/><j/></i></e>
      <e><i>rarely<s n="adv"/><j/></i></e>
      <e><i>regularly<s n="adv"/><j/></i></e>
      <e><i>seldom<s n="adv"/><j/></i></e>
      <e><i>semi-anually<s n="adv"/><j/></i></e>
      <e><i>so<s n="adv"/><j/></i></e>
      <e><i>sometimes<s n="adv"/><j/></i></e>
      <e><i>too<s n="adv"/><j/></i></e>
      <e><i>usually<s n="adv"/><j/></i></e>
      <e><i>weekly<s n="adv"/><j/></i></e>
      <e><i>yearly<s n="adv"/><j/></i></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="person">
      <e><par n="np"/></e>
      <e><par n="np"/><par n="np"/></e>
      <e><par n="prn"/></e>
      <e><par n="modifier-n"/></e>
      <e><par n="det-modifier-n"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="SA">
      <e><par n="adj"/><par n="cnjcoo"/><par n="adj"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="SAdv">
      <e><par n="adv"/></e>
      <e><par n="adv"/><par n="freq-adv"/></e>
      <e><par n="freq-adv"/></e>
      <e><par n="freq-adv"/><par n="adv"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="SN">
      <e><par n="n"/></e>
      <e><par n="num"/></e>
      <e><par n="person"/></e>
      <e><par n="n"/><par n="gen"/><par n="n"/></e>
      <e><par n="np"/><par n="gen"/><par n="n"/></e>
      <e><par n="modifier-n"/><par n="gen"/><par n="n"/></e>
      <e><par n="det-modifier-n"/><par n="gen"/><par n="n"/></e>
      <!-- <e><par n="det-modifier-n"/><par n="pr"/><par n="modifier-n"/></e>
      <e><par n="det-modifier-n"/><par n="pr"/><par n="det-modifier-n"/></e> -->
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="SN-adv">
      <e><par n="SN"/></e>
      <e><par n="SN"/><par n="adv"/></e>
      <e><par n="SN"/><par n="adv"/><par n="adv"/></e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="be against" c="estar en contrera de">
      <p><l>be<s n="vbser"/></l><r>be<g><b/>against</g><s n="vbser"/><s n="sep"/></r></p><i><t/><j/></i>
      <par n="SAdv"/><p><l>against</l><r></r></p><i><t/><j/></i>
    </e>
    <e lm="be early" c="llegar temprano">
      <p><l>be<s n="vbser"/></l><r>be<g><b/>early</g><s n="vbser"/><s n="sep"/></r></p><i><t/><j/></i>
      <par n="SAdv"/><p><l>early</l><r></r></p><i><t/><j/></i>
    </e>
    <e lm="be integrated into" c="asimilado">
      <p><l>be<s n="vbser"/></l><r>be<g><b/>integrated</g><s n="vbser"/><s n="sep"/></r></p><i><t/><j/></i>
      <par n="SAdv"/><p><l>integrated<b/>into</l><r>into<s n="pr"/></r></p><i><t/><j/></i>
    </e>
    <e lm="be late" c="llegar tarde">
      <p><l>be<s n="vbser"/></l><r>be<g><b/>late</g><s n="vbser"/><s n="sep"/></r></p><i><t/><j/></i>
      <par n="SAdv"/><p><l>late</l><r></r></p><i><t/><j/></i>
    </e>
    <e lm="be on one's way" c="estar en camino">
      <p><l>be<s n="vbser"/></l><r>be<g><b/>on<b/>one's<b/>way</g><s n="vbser"/><s n="sep"/></r></p><i><t/><j/></i>
      <p><l>on<s n="pr"/><j/></l><r></r></p><par n="det-pos"/><p><l>way<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></l><r></r></p>
    </e>
    <e lm="be opposed to" c="estar en contrera de">
      <p><l>be<s n="vbser"/></l><r>be<g><b/>oppose</g><s n="vbser"/><s n="sep"/></r></p><i><t/><j/></i>
      <par n="SAdv"/><p><l>oppose<t/><b/>to<s n="pr"/></l><r>to<s n="pr"/></r></p><i><j/></i>
    </e>
    <e lm="bring down" c="abatir">
      <p><l>bring<s n="vblex"/></l><r>bring<g><b/>down</g><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/></r></p><i><t/><j/></i>
      <par n="person"/><p><l>down</l><r></r></p><i><t/><j/></i>
    </e>
    <e lm="bring together" c="juntar">
      <p><l>bring<s n="vblex"/></l><r>bring<g><b/>together</g><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/></r></p><i><t/><j/></i>
      <par n="SN"/><p><l>together</l><r></r></p><i><t/><j/></i>
    </e>
    <e lm="buoy up" c="alentar">
      <p><l>buoy<s n="vblex"/></l><r>buoy<g><b/>up</g><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/></r></p><i><t/><j/></i>
      <par n="person"/><p><l>up</l><r></r></p><i><t/><j/></i>
    </e>
    <e lm="chat up" c="ligarse con">
      <p><l>chat<s n="vblex"/></l><r>chat<g><b/>up</g><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/></r></p><i><t/><j/></i>
      <par n="person"/><p><l>up</l><r></r></p><i><t/><j/></i>
    </e>
    <e lm="check in" c="despachar">
      <p><l>check<s n="vblex"/></l><r>check<g><b/>in</g><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/></r></p><i><t/><j/></i>
      <par n="SN"/><p><l>in</l><r></r></p><i><t/><j/></i>
    </e>
    <e lm="depend on" c="depender de">
      <p><l>depend<s n="vblex"/></l><r>depend<g><b/>on</g><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/></r></p><i><t/><j/></i>
      <par n="SAdv"/><p><l>on</l><r></r></p><i><t/><j/></i>
    </e>
    <e lm="depend upon" c="depender de">
      <p><l>depend<s n="vblex"/></l><r>depend<g><b/>on</g><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/></r></p><i><t/><j/></i>
      <par n="SAdv"/><p><l>upon</l><r></r></p><i><t/><j/></i>
    </e>
    <e lm="dig up" c="desenterrar, sacar a la luz">
      <p><l>dig<s n="vblex"/></l><r>dig<g><b/>up</g></r></p><i><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><t/><j/></i>
      <par n="SN"/><p><l>up</l><r></r></p><i><t/><j/></i>
    </e>
    <e lm="dress up" c="ponerse elegante">
      <p><l>dress<s n="vblex"/></l><r>dress<g><b/>up</g><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/></r></p><i><t/><j/></i>
      <par n="person"/><p><l>up</l><r></r></p><i><t/><j/></i>
    </e>
    <e lm="foul up" c="meter la pata">
      <p><l>foul<s n="vblex"/></l><r>foul<g><b/>up</g><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/></r></p><i><t/><j/></i>
      <par n="SN"/><p><l>up</l><r></r></p><i><t/><j/></i>
    </e>
    <e lm="give up" c="rendirse">
      <p><l>give<s n="vblex"/></l><r>give<g><b/>up</g><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/></r></p><i><t/><j/></i>
      <par n="SN"/><p><l>up</l><r></r></p><i><t/><j/></i>
    </e>
    <e lm="hold responsible" c="hacer responsable">
      <p><l>hold<s n="vblex"/></l><r>hold<g><b/>responsible</g><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/></r></p><i><t/><j/></i>
      <par n="person"/><p><l>responsible</l><r></r></p><i><t/><j/></i>
    </e>
    <e lm="line up" c="poner en fila">
      <p><l>line<s n="vblex"/></l><r>line<g><b/>up</g><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/></r></p><i><t/><j/></i>
      <par n="SN"/><p><l>up</l><r></r></p><i><t/><j/></i>
    </e>
    <e lm="make angry" c="enfadar">
      <p><l>make<s n="vblex"/></l><r>make<g><b/>angry</g><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/></r></p><i><t/><j/></i>
      <par n="person"/><p><l>angry</l><r></r></p><i><t/><j/></i>
    </e>
    <e lm="make compatible" c="combinar">
      <p><l>make<s n="vblex"/></l><r>make<g><b/>compatible</g><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/></r></p><i><t/><j/></i>
      <par n="SN-adv"/><p><l>compatible</l><r></r></p><i><t/><j/></i>
    </e>
    <e lm="make compatible" c="depender de">
      <p><l>make<s n="vblex"/></l><r>make<g><b/>compatible</g><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/></r></p><i><t/><j/></i>
      <par n="SN-adv"/><par n="SAdv"/><p><l>on</l><r></r></p><i><t/><j/></i>
    </e>
    <e lm="make impossible" c="hacer imposible">
      <p><l>make<s n="vblex"/></l><r>make<g><b/>impossible</g><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/></r></p><i><t/><j/></i>
      <par n="SN-adv"/><p><l>impossible</l><r></r></p><i><t/><j/></i>
    </e>
    <e lm="note down" c="apuntar">
      <p><l>note<s n="vblex"/></l><r>note<g><b/>down</g><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/></r></p><i><t/><j/></i>
      <par n="SN"/><p><l>down</l><r></r></p><i><t/><j/></i>
    </e>
    <e lm="patch up" c="mejorar">
      <p><l>patch<s n="vblex"/></l><r>patch<g><b/>up</g><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/></r></p><i><t/><j/></i>
      <par n="person"/><p><l>up</l><r></r></p><i><t/><j/></i>
    </e>
    <e lm="piss off" c="sacar, tocar las narices">
      <p><l>piss<s n="vblex"/></l><r>piss<g><b/>off</g><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/></r></p><i><t/><j/></i>
      <par n="person"/><p><l>off</l><r></r></p><i><t/><j/></i>
    </e>
    <e lm="pommel away" c="	golpear">
      <p><l>pommel<s n="vblex"/></l><r>pommel<g><b/>away</g><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/></r></p><i><t/><j/></i>
      <par n="SN"/><p><l>away</l><r></r></p><i><t/><j/></i>
    </e>
    <e lm="set off" c="activar">
      <p><l>set<s n="vblex"/></l><r>set<g><b/>off</g><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/></r></p><i><t/><j/></i>
      <par n="SN"/><p><l>off</l><r></r></p><i><t/><j/></i>
    </e>
    <e lm="take for granted" c="dar por hecho">
      <p><l>take<s n="vblex"/></l><r>take<g><b/>for<b/>granted</g><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/></r></p><i><t/><j/></i>
      <par n="SN"/><p><l>for<b/>granted<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></l><r></r></p><i><j/></i>
    </e>
    <e lm="take one's chances" c="jugarse">
      <p><l>take<s n="vblex"/></l><r>take<g><b/>one's<b/>chances</g><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/></r></p><i><t/><j/></i>
      <par n="det-pos"/><p><l>chance<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></l><r></r></p><i><j/></i>
    </e>
    <e lm="turn off" c="apagar">
      <p><l>turn<s n="vblex"/></l><r>turn<g><b/>off</g><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/></r></p><i><t/><j/></i>
      <par n="SN"/><p><l>off</l><r></r></p><i><t/><j/></i>
    </e>
    <e lm="wear out" c="agotar">
      <p><l>wear<s n="vblex"/></l><r>wear<g><b/>out</g><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/></r></p><i><t/><j/></i>
      <par n="person"/><p><l>out</l><r></r></p><i><t/><j/></i>
    </e>
    <e lm="wipe up" c="limpiar">
      <p><l>wipe<s n="vblex"/></l><r>wipe<g><b/>up</g><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/></r></p><i><t/><j/></i>
      <par n="SN"/><p><l>up</l><r></r></p><i><t/><j/></i>
    </e>
    <e lm="wire up" c="poner un micrófono">
      <p><l>wire<s n="vblex"/></l><r>wire<g><b/>up</g><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/></r></p><i><t/><j/></i>
      <par n="person"/><p><l>up</l><r></r></p><i><t/><j/></i>
    </e>
